Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Teachers’ Defined Benefit Retirement Plan.
Sec. 14.25.075.
Purchase of credited service.

An employee who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

14.25.047

or

14.25.048

, a member who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

14.25.048

,

14.25.050

,

14.25.060

,

14.25.061

,

14.25.100

, or

14.25.107

, or a teacher who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

14.20.345

, AS

14.25.050

, or

14.25.105

, in lieu of making payments directly to the plan, may elect to have the member’s employer make payments as provided in this section.

A member may elect to have the employer make payments for all or any portion of the amounts payable for the member’s purchase of credited service through a salary reduction program as follows:

the amounts paid under a salary reduction program are in lieu of contributions by the member making the election; the electing member’s salary or other compensation shall be reduced by the amount paid by the employer under this subsection;

the member shall make an irrevocable election under this subsection to purchase credited service as permitted in AS

14.20.345

, AS

14.25.047

,

14.25.048

,

14.25.050

,

14.25.060

,

14.25.061

,

14.25.100

,

14.25.105

, or

14.25.107

before the member’s termination of employment; the irrevocable election must specify the number of payroll periods that deductions will be made from the member’s compensation and the dollar amount of deductions for each payroll period during the specified number of payroll periods; the deductions made under this paragraph cease upon the earlier of the member’s termination of employment with the employer or the member’s death; amounts paid by an employer under (f) of this section may not be applied toward the payment of the dollar amount of the deductions representing the portion of the credited service that is being purchased by the member through payroll deduction in accordance with the member’s irrevocable election under this paragraph;

amounts paid by an employer under this subsection shall be treated as employer contributions for the purpose of determining tax treatment under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code); the amounts paid by the employer under this section may not be included in the member’s gross income for income tax purposes until those amounts are distributed by refund or retirement benefit payments.

Unless otherwise provided, member contributions paid by the employer under this section are treated for all other purposes under the plan in the same manner and to the same extent as member contributions that are not paid by an employer under this section and AS

14.25.050

. The plan may assess interest or administrative charges attributable to any salary reduction election made under this section. The interest or administrative charges shall be added to the contribution that is made to the plan by the member each payroll period, and that is paid by the employer. The interest or administrative charges may not be treated as member contributions for any purposes under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, and a member or a member’s beneficiary does not have a right to the return of the interest or administrative charges under any other provision of this section. Interest assessed under this section shall be at the rate specified by regulations adopted by the administrator.

For plan fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2001, the requirements of AS

14.25.110(k)

may not be applied to reduce the amount of credited service that may be purchased under this section by a member who first becomes an employee of the plan before July 1, 2001, to an amount that is less than the amount of credited service allowed to be purchased with the application of any of the limits prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 415.

Contributions to the plan to purchase credited service under this section do not qualify for treatment under this section if recognition of that service would cause a member to receive a retirement benefit for the same service from the plan and from one or more other retirement plans or systems of the state.

The administrator may accept rollover contributions from a member. Contributions made under this subsection may not be applied to purchase service being paid under (b) of this section. A rollover contribution as described in this subsection shall be treated as employer contributions for the purpose of determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code and may be made by any one or a combination of the following methods:

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 402(c), accepting eligible rollover distributions directly from one or more eligible retirement plans as defined by 26 U.S.C. 402(c)(8)(B);

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 403(b)(13), accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfers of all or a portion of the accounts of the member, on or after January 1, 2002, from a tax sheltered annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 457(e)(17), accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfers of all or a portion of the accounts of the member, on or after January 1, 2002, from an eligible deferred compensation plan of a tax-exempt organization or a state or local government described in 26 U.S.C. 457(b);

accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfer from an account established for the benefit of the member in AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

(Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan).

Payments made under this section shall be applied to reduce the member’s outstanding indebtedness described in AS

14.25.063

at the time that the contributions are received by the plan.

If a member retires before all payments are made under this section, the plan shall calculate the member’s benefits based only on the payments actually made with respect to the credited service purchased.

On satisfaction of the eligibility requirements of AS

14.20.345

, AS

14.25.047

,

14.25.048

,

14.25.050

,

14.25.060

,

14.25.061

,

14.25.100

,

14.25.105

, or

14.25.107

, the requirements of this section, and the administrative filing requirements specified by the administrator, the plan shall adjust the member’s credited service history and add any additional service credits acquired.

After an election is made under this section, the election is binding on and irrevocable for the member and the member’s employer during the member’s remaining period of current employment. After a member makes an irrevocable election under this section, the member does not have the option of choosing to receive the contributed amounts directly in cash.

History.

(§ 5 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 7 — 10, 32 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 12 — 14, 16 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 4, 5 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter”, “administrator” was substituted for “board”, and “plan” was substituted for “system”.
Also in 2005, in (a) of this section, “system” was substituted for “plan” to correct a manifest error, consistent with AS

14.25.009

.

Sec. 14.25.080.
Contributions by the state. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.25.085.
Additional state contributions.

In addition to the contributions that the state is required to make under AS

14.25.070

as an employer, the state shall contribute to the plan each July 1 or, if funds are not available on July 1, as soon after July 1 as funds become available, an amount for the ensuing fiscal year that, when combined with the total employer contributions that the administrator estimates will be allocated under AS

14.25.070

(c), is sufficient to pay the plan’s past service liability at the contribution rate adopted by the board under AS

37.10.220

for that fiscal year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For protection of damage awards from reduction on account of contributions under this section, see AS

09.17.070(f)

.

Effective dates. —

Section 27, ch. 13, SLA 2008 makes this section effective July 1, 2008.

Sec. 14.25.087.
Contributions for medical benefits.

Contributions made by an employer under AS

14.25.070

and

14.25.085

shall be separately computed for benefits provided by AS

14.25.168

and shall be deposited in the Alaska retiree health care trust established under AS

39.30.097(a)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Sec. 14.25.090.
Contributions by the state for arrearages. [Repealed, § 7 ch 66 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 14.25.100.
Credit for service in the armed forces.

A member who served as an active member of the armed forces of the United States may receive credited service under this plan up to a maximum of five years if the member received a discharge under other than dishonorable conditions and is not entitled to receive retirement benefits from the United States government for the same service. Each 12 months of military service equals one school year, and lesser military periods will be determined for credit purposes in a proportionate ratio to a year. Credit for service in the armed forces shall be granted only if the member makes contributions for the service in the same manner as required for outside service under AS

14.25.060

. The military service credited under this section shall be included in the 10-year limitation of outside service as specified in AS

14.25.060

, except if entry into the armed forces is immediately preceded by Alaska membership service and following discharge is continued by Alaska membership service within one year thereafter, service may not be counted for purposes of determining the applicability of the 10-year limitation on outside service.

Where a member is unable to resume teaching in a public school within one year following discharge because of hospitalization, rehabilitation training, a disability derived while in the armed forces, or other like circumstances, the administrator shall determine the allowance or disallowance of any service in the armed forces.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 155 SLA 1976.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 155 SLA 1976.]

A member may not be credited with the same period of service in the armed forces under this section if credit for that military service was granted under the public employees’ retirement system ( AS 39.35). The combined period of military service claimed under this section and AS 39.35 may not exceed five years.

History.

(§ 11 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1974; am §§ 5, 7 ch 155 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 13 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in subsection (a).

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Sec. 14.25.105.
Credit for service as an employee of the Territory of Alaska.

A teacher who completes 15 years of membership service under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

may elect to receive credited service for employment rendered to the Territory of Alaska before January 3, 1959, regardless of the office, department, division or agency of the territory in which employed. Credited service allowed under this section may not exceed five years.

A teacher may not be credited with service under this section if credit for service as an employee of the Territory of Alaska was granted for the same period under AS 39.35 (public employees’ retirement system).

A teacher who elects to receive credited service under this section for service to the Territory of Alaska shall make a retroactive contribution under this plan for the period of territorial employment following June 30, 1955.

History.

(§ 1 ch 146 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and in subsection (c), “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Sec. 14.25.107.
Credit for Alaska BIA service.

A member who joins the plan on or after July 1, 1978, who has Alaska BIA service may claim all of that service as credited service.
A retirement benefit payable under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

for Alaska BIA service shall be reduced by an amount equal to the retirement benefits paid to the member by the United States government for the same service.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Cross references. —

For conversion of claimed BIA contract school service to BIA service, see § 2, ch. 44, SLA 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 14.25.110.
Retirement benefits.

Subject to AS

14.25.167

, a member is eligible for a normal retirement benefit if the member

was first hired before July 1, 1975, has attained the age of 55 years, and has at least 15 years of credited service, the last five of which have been membership service, or is otherwise vested in the plan;

has attained the age of 60 years and has at least eight years of membership service;

has attained the age of 60 years, has at least five years of membership service, and has Alaska BIA service which, when added to the membership service, will equal at least eight years;

has at least 25 years of credited service, the last five of which have been membership service;

has at least 20 years of membership service;

has at least 20 years of combined membership service and Alaska BIA service, the last five of which have been membership service; or

has, for each of 20 school years,

at least one-half year of membership service as a part-time teacher;

one full year of membership service as a full-time teacher; or

any combination of service qualified under this paragraph.

Subject to AS

14.25.167

, a member is eligible for an early retirement benefit upon completing the service requirements in (a)(1) of this section and attaining the age of 50 years or upon completing the service requirements in (a)(2) or (3) of this section and attaining the age of 55 years.

The burden is on the applicant to prove eligibility for retirement benefits to the full satisfaction of the administrator.

The monthly amount of a retirement benefit for a member who has paid the full amount of any indebtedness is one-twelfth of the member’s average base salary during any three school years of membership service multiplied by

two percent of the years of credited service earned before June 30, 1990, including credited fractional years, and the years of credited service through a total of 20 years; plus

two and one-half percent of the years of credited service earned after June 30, 1990, that are more than 20 years of total credited service.

The monthly amount of a retirement benefit must be determined in accordance with (d) of this section as it is in effect on the date of termination of the retiring member’s last segment of employment.

[Repealed, § 47 ch 59 SLA 2002.]

[Repealed, § 47 ch 59 SLA 2002.]

[Repealed, § 47 ch 59 SLA 2002.]

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month after which all of the following requirements are met: (1) the member meets the eligibility requirements of this section; (2) the member terminates employment; and (3) the member applies for retirement. Benefits are not payable under this section during a school year in which credit for a full year of service is granted. The benefits are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment must be made for the month in which a benefit is payable under this section. The last payment shall be for the month in which the member dies or is no longer eligible for a benefit under this section.

An actuarial adjustment must be made to benefits payable under (d) of this section for early retirement.

For plan fiscal years beginning after December 31, 1975, and notwithstanding any other provision of AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, the projected annual benefit provided by AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

and the benefit from all other defined benefit plans required to be aggregated with the benefits from this plan under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415 may not increase to an amount in excess of the amount permitted under 26 U.S.C. 415 at any time. In the event that any projected annual benefit of a member exceeds the limitation of 26 U.S.C. 415 for a limitation year, the plan shall take any necessary remedial action to correct an excess accrued annual benefit. The provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415, and the regulations adopted under that statute, as applied to qualified defined benefit plans of governmental employers are incorporated as part of the terms and conditions of the plan. This subsection applies to any member of this plan.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section,

for the plan fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 1996, the base salary of a member who joined the plan after the first day of the first plan fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1995, that is used to calculate the member’s average base salary may not exceed $150,000, as adjusted for the cost of living in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B); and

for plan fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, the base salary of a member that is used to calculate the member’s average base salary may not exceed $200,000, as adjusted for the cost of living in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B).

Notwithstanding the definition of “base salary” in AS

14.25.220

, in ( l) of this section, for plan fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and for purposes of 26 U.S.C. 415(b)(3) and the regulations adopted under that statute,

“base salary”

includes any amount that is contributed by the employer under a salary reduction agreement and that is not includable in the member’s gross income under 26 U.S.C. 125, 132(f)(4), 402(e)(3), 402(h), or 403(b); and

is limited to compensation that is actually paid to a member during the determination period;

“determination period” means the plan fiscal year.

History.

(§ 12 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 9 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 6 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1971; am § 8 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1974; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 173 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 169 SLA 1976; am § 14 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 22 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1990; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 97 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 6, 47 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 11 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system”.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

For employment of professional personnel, see 4 AAC 18.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature did not intend such a strict interpretation as to require a teacher to work the last 5 school years for the full 140-day year. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

A teacher satisfies the requirement of subsection (a) by working any five creditable years or combination of fractional years totalling 5 years, as long as they are the last 5 years she worked and they are in membership service. 1966 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 2, issued prior to the 1975 amendment.

Sec. 14.25.115.
Unused sick leave credit.

A teacher in membership service on or after July 1, 1977, who is appointed to retirement on or after July 1, 1978, may elect to apply unused sick leave credit in computing the total number of years of credited service under AS

14.25.110(d)

except for sick leave earned while participating in a university retirement program under AS

14.40.661

—

14.40.799

. To obtain service credit for unused sick leave, a teacher must apply to the administrator not later than one year after appointment to retirement. Unused sick leave shall be credited on a day-for-day basis in accordance with the table for service after July 1, 1969, contained in AS

14.25.220

(47). Teacher contributions may not be required for credited unused sick leave.

A teacher appointed to retirement before July 1, 1978, who returns to membership service on or after July 1, 1978, and is subsequently reappointed to retirement is eligible for unused sick leave credit only with respect to sick leave accrued during membership service on or after July 1, 1978.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month after which all the following requirements are met: (1) the teacher meets the eligibility requirements of this section; (2) the teacher’s written application for unused sick leave credit is received and verified by the administrator; and (3) a period of time has elapsed since the date of appointment to retirement equal to the amount of verified unused sick leave. Benefits are payable on the last day of the month.

History.

(§ 13 ch 136 SLA 1978; am § 29 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1989; am § 17 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (a), “AS

14.25.220

(45)” was substituted for “AS

14.25.220

(43)” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of paragraphs in AS 14.25.220.

In 2014, in subsection (a), “AS

14.25.220

(47)” was substituted for “AS

14.25.220

(45)” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of paragraphs in AS 14.25.220.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Sec. 14.25.120.
Manner of computing service retirement salary. [Repealed, § 50 ch 13 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.25.125.
Conditional service retirement benefits.

Subject to AS

14.25.167

, a member is eligible for a normal retirement salary at age 60 with at least

two years membership service if the member also is eligible for a normal retirement benefit under the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35); or

one year of membership service if the member is a retired member of the public employees’ retirement system.

Subject to AS

14.25.167

, a member is eligible for an early retirement salary at age 55 with at least

two years of membership service if the member also is eligible for an early retirement benefit under the public employees’ retirement system (AS 39.35);

one year of membership service if the member is a retired member of the public employees’ retirement system.

Membership service for which contributions were refunded is not creditable under this section.

The monthly amount of a conditional service retirement benefit shall be calculated on the years of credited service in accordance with AS

14.25.110(d)

, except that a member may irrevocably elect to substitute “average monthly compensation” as defined in AS

39.35.680

in place of the member’s average base salary divided by 12.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month (1) in which the member meets the eligibility requirements of this section, (2) following the date of termination, and (3) following application for retirement, and are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be made for the month in which the member dies or is no longer eligible for a benefit under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 174 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 4 ch 117 SLA 1986; am §§ 9, 10 ch 97 SLA 1990; am §§ 7, 8 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “plan” was substituted for “system” in subsection (c).

Sec. 14.25.130.
Disability benefits.

A member who has five or more years of membership service is eligible for a disability pension if, after July 1, 1966, and before the member’s normal retirement date, the member’s employment is terminated because of a permanent disability as defined in AS

14.25.220

.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 13 SLA 1980.]

Once each year during the first five years following appointment to disability under this section, and once every three-year period thereafter, the administrator may require a disabled member who has not attained eligibility for normal retirement to undergo a medical or mental examination by a competent physician. The administrator shall suspend any disability benefit for a disabled member who refuses to undergo a physical or mental examination when requested under this section.

The amount of the disability benefit is equal to 50 percent of the member’s base salary immediately before becoming disabled. The disability benefit is increased by 10 percent of the member’s base salary immediately before becoming disabled for each dependent child, up to a maximum of four dependent children.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month after which the following requirements are met: (1) the member meets the eligibility requirements of this section; and (2) the member terminates employment. The benefits are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment must be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment for a dependent child shall be for the month in which the child ceases to be a dependent child. The last payment for the disabled member shall be made for the month in which the disabled member recovers from the disability, dies, or is eligible for normal retirement.

A member is not entitled to a disability benefit under this section unless the member files a timely application for the benefit with the administrator. The application is timely if it is filed by the later of six months after the date that the member’s disability began or 90 days after the termination of the member’s employment. The administrator may waive a filing deadline under this subsection if there are extraordinary circumstances that resulted in the inability to meet the filing deadline. The administrator may delegate the authority to waive a filing deadline under this subsection to the administrator.

History.

(§ 14 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 12 ch 89 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1963; am § 8 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 15 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 173 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 169 SLA 1976; am § 16 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 8, 9 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “administrator” was substituted for “board” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The disability retirement provisions of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Teachers’ Retirement System are consistent with the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended (29 U.S.C. §§ 621 - 634), and with the implementing regulations of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. December 10, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 14.25.135 — 14.25.140.
Deferred retirement benefits; notification of intent to retire; manner of computing disability retirement salary. [Repealed, § 50 ch 13 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.25.142.
Cost-of-living allowance.

While residing in the state, a person receiving a benefit under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

who is at least 65 years of age or who is receiving a disability benefit under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

is entitled to receive a monthly cost-of-living allowance in addition to the basic benefit. The amount of this allowance is 10 percent of the basic benefit.

A person receiving a cost-of-living allowance under this section shall notify the administrator when the person expects to be absent from the state for a continuous period that exceeds 90 days. After that notification, the person is no longer entitled to receive the monthly cost-of-living allowance, except that a person may be absent from the state for not more than six months without loss of the cost-of-living allowance if the absence is the result of illness and required by order of a licensed physician. Upon return to the state, and upon notification to the administrator, the person is again entitled to receive the monthly cost-of-living allowance, commencing with the first monthly benefit payment made after notification of the person’s return.

In this section, “residing in the state” means domiciled and physically present in the State of Alaska. A person’s status as “residing in the state” does not change if the person is absent from the state for a continuous period of

90 days or less;

six months or less, when ordered by a physician to be absent from the state; or

any length of time while the person is a member of a reserve or auxiliary component of the armed forces of the United States, including the organized militia of Alaska consisting of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, and the Alaska State Defense Force, and is called to active duty by the appropriate state or federal authority.

History.

(§ 10 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 18 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 6 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 2, 3 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 11 ch 97 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 82, SLA 1979 provides
§A person receiving benefits under
AS 14.25 on July 1, 1979 is eligible for any increase in benefits resulting from the amendments to
AS 14.25 enacted in §§ 2 and 3 of ch. 82, SLA 1979.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Regulation 2 AAC 36.210 is consistent with this statute. However, we also understand that the Teachers’ Retirement System (TRS) has, prior to the adoption of the regulation, paid the COLA to benefit recipients whom TRS considered to be residents but who would not have met the 93/183 days test. In light of that, we conclude that the regulation should only be applied to those joining TRS after its adoption. March 15, 1995 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.25.143.
Post retirement pension adjustment.

Once each year, the administrator shall increase benefit payments to eligible disabled members, to persons age 60 or older receiving benefits under this plan in the preceding calendar year, and to persons who have received benefits under this plan for at least eight years who are not otherwise eligible for an increase under this section.

The increase in benefit payments applies to total benefit payments except for the cost-of-living allowance under AS

14.25.142

. The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current benefit equal to

the lesser of 75 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or nine percent, for recipients who on July 1 are at least 65 years old and for members receiving disability benefits; and

the lesser of 50 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or six percent, for recipients who on July 1 are at least 60 but less than 65 years old or for recipients who on July 1 are less than 60 years old but who have received benefits from the plan for at least eight years.

If a recipient was not receiving benefits during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in benefits under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by the fraction whose numerator is the number of months for which benefits were received in the preceding calendar year and whose denominator is 12.

If at the time of first receiving a retirement benefit, a member was receiving a disability benefit under this plan, the administrator shall, at the time the member is appointed to retirement, increase the retirement benefit by a percentage equal to the total cumulative percentage increase that has been applied to the member’s disability benefit under this section.

When computing a death benefit under AS

14.25.155

,

14.25.157

, or

14.25.160

or a survivor’s benefit under AS

14.25.162

,

14.25.164

, or

14.25.167

, adjustments granted to the deceased member or survivor under this section shall be included in the computation.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska during the previous calendar year as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

History.

(§ 11 ch 151 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1971; am § 19 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 1974; am § 7 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 17 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 97 SLA 1990; am §§ 18, 19 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefits plan of the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 36, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefits plan (AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. The version of this statute that was in effect immediately after the 1980 amendments read as follows:

“Sec. 14.25.143. POST RETIREMENT PENSION ADJUSTMENT. (a) When the administrator determines that the cost of living has increased and that the financial condition of the retirement fund permits, the administrator shall increase benefit payments to persons receiving benefits under this system.

“(b) The amount of the increase in benefit payments may not exceed the greater of

“(1) the increase in the cost of living since the date of retirement; or

“(2) four percent of the retirement benefit compounded for each year of retirement.

“(c) The administrator shall implement this section by regulation.

“(d) A person receiving benefits under this chapter shall be granted a 10 percent increase in the current base benefit if the person was receiving benefits on July 1, 1976. The increase shall be effective July 1, 1977.

“(e) If at the time of first receiving a retirement benefit a member was receiving a disability benefit, the administrator shall include the time during which the member received the disability benefit in determining the number of years of retirement under this section.

“(f) An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of the year for which the increase in granted.”

Section 48, ch. 146, SLA 1980 provides: “The retirement benefit payable to a member of the teachers’ retirement system who is receiving a normal retirement benefit under AS

14.25.110

on July 1, 1980, and who at the time of his retirement was receiving a disability benefit under the teachers’ retirement system, shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage of all post-retirement pension adjustments payable under AS

14.25.143

during the period that the member was receiving a disability benefit.”

Under §§ 18 and 19, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, following amendment by sec. 3, ch. 146, SLA 1980, and until amended by sec. 12, ch. 97, SLA 1990, (a) of this section read: “(a) When the administrator determines that the cost of living has increased and that the financial condition of the retirement fund permits, the administrator shall increase benefit payments to persons receiving benefits under this plan. For purposes of this subsection, the financial condition of the fund would only permit an increase in benefits when the ratio of total fund assets to the accrued liability meets or exceeds 105 percent. In this subsection, “accrued liability” means the present value of all member benefits accrued by member service in this plan.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the financial condition of the funds does not permit payment of the PRPA, it is allowable to prospectively not pay existing members new [or additional] ad hoc PRPAs.
However, a new statutory provision cannot reduce the existing number of members who retain a vested right to a PRPA if one is awarded, unless the new statutory provision includes comparable enhancements to benefits.
April 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Legislation that limits the administrator’s discretion and allows an award of an ad hoc PRPA only if a retirement fund is actuarially funded at over 100 percent and employer contribution rates are set at less than eight percent would be subject to challenge under existing case law.
The constitutional rights of members regarding the ad hoc PRPA include the right to consideration of an award of a PRPA based on the discretion existing under the repealed statutes.
April 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.25.145.
Interest on individual accounts.

Interest shall be credited to each teacher’s account at the end of each school year at the rate prescribed by the board for that year.

History.

(§ 16 ch 145 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 142 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 78 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 138 SLA 1970; am § 20 ch 66 SLA 1973; am § 20 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)